Tennessee, session 114, HB2086.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-228, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting instead the following:
(a)
(1) Notwithstanding this part to the contrary and except as otherwise
provided in subdivision (a)(2) and subsection (b), the retail sale of food and food
ingredients for human consumption is taxed at the rate of four percent (4%) of
the sales price.
(2) Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, the retail sale of fresh fruit
and vegetables for human consumption is exempt from the tax levied by this
chapter.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2086
012144
- 1 -